North Carolina, session 2025, SB31.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Legislative Library is directed to send a request for documentation
and confirmation of activity to all boards, committees, and commissions that have not expired or
been repealed. The documentation required by this section includes the current membership, last
reported minutes, current bylaws, and a listing of the entities to which reports are to be submitted.
For any board, committee, or commission that either (i) fails to respond within 120 days to the
request required by this section or (ii) responds but has not met within the previous 12 months,
the Legislative Library will add the board, committee, or commission to a list and will submit
the final compiled list to the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee.
The Committee is directed to recommend legislation to repeal the boards and commissions on
the list required by and submitted pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. The Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee
is directed to recommend legislation to the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly
upon its convening to repeal the boards and commissions on the list required by, and submitted
to it pursuant to, Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S31-v-1*